Maine, session 132, LD580.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §8-512 is enacted to read:
§8-512. Fees associated with paper billing statements prohibited
1. Fees prohibited. A card issuer who has issued a credit card may not charge a
cardholder an additional fee associated with a credit card account when the cardholder
chooses to receive a paper account statement. This subsection may not be construed to
prohibit a card issuer who has issued a credit card from offering a cardholder a credit or
other incentive to elect a specific method for receipt of an account statement.
2. Violation. Any violation of this section by a card issuer who has issued a credit
card is subject to enforcement under section 8-505.
3. Rights under other statute or common law. This section may not be construed
to restrict any right that a person may have under any other statute or the common law.
Sec. 2. 9-B MRSA §245 is enacted to read:
§245. Fees associated with paper billing statements prohibited
1. Fees prohibited. A financial institution authorized to do business in this State or a
credit union authorized to do business in this State may not charge a customer an additional
fee associated with an account when the customer chooses to receive a paper account
statement. This subsection may not be construed to prohibit a financial institution
authorized to do business in this State or a credit union authorized to do business in this
State from offering a customer a credit or other incentive to elect a specific method for
receipt of an account statement.
2. Violation. Any violation of this section by a financial institution authorized to do
business in this State or a credit union authorized to do business in this State is an
anticompetitive or deceptive practice under this chapter and subject to the remedies
provided in this chapter in addition to such other remedies as may otherwise be provided
by law.
3. Rights under other statute or common law. This section may not be construed to
restrict any right that a person may have under any other statute or the common law.